apertium-khk.khk.twol
"{а} vowel harmony for Y cons"
%{а%}:Vy <=> .#. (:NonVow) :Vx [ [ :NonVow - Y: ]* [ :NonVow - Y: ] ]/:0 _ [ :Sonorant | :х | :ж ] (:NonVow/:0) [ .#. | %  | :Vow ] ;
                  ! идэж
             !.#. (:NonVow) :Vx [ [ :NonVow - Y: ] ( [ :NonVow - Y: ] ) ]/:0 _ [ :д | :в | :н | :л | :г ] .#. ;
         except
             :PalConsA/[ :0 - ь: ] _ ;   ! avoid conflict with after palcons
             ь:/[ :0 - ь:0 ] _ [ :NonVow* :NonVow ]/:0* [ :Vow | .#. | %  ] ;
             !ь:/[ :0 - ь:0 ] _ х: ;
             ь:/[ :0 - ь:0 ] _ [ х: | н: | в: ] ;
             [ :Vow | %{а%}: ] [ :л | :Nasal | :Y | :р ]/:0 _ :д ;
             :Vx [ [ :Sonorant - :Nasal ] (:ь) ]/:0 _ [ %{Ж%}: ]/:0 .#. ;    ! ирж, явч
             :NonVow _ :л [ :Vow | %{а%}: ] ;
             :Vow :й :0* _ ;             ! хийх, хийж
         where Vx in ( я е ю ё и )
               Vy in ( а э а о э )
         matched ;

!"{a} is front unrounded after first-initial [non-transparent] и"
!%{а%}:э <=> .#. [ :NonVow/:0 ]* :и [ :NonVow/:0 ]* [ :т | :д | :с ]/:0 _ ;

!"{a} is front unrounded after first-initial [non-transparent] и"
!%{а%}:э <=> .#. [ :NonVow/:0 ]* :и [ :NonVow/:0 ]* [ :NonVow ]/:0 _ :NonVow/:0 [ .#. | %  ] ;

"{а} after palatal cons"
%{а%}:и <=> :PalConsA/[ :0 - ь: ] _ ;
            ь:/[ :0 - ь:0 ] _ [ :NonVow* :NonVow ]/:0* [ :Vow | .#. | %  ] ;
            ь:/[ :0 - ь:0 ] _ [ х: | н: | в: ] ;
        except
            :PalConsA _ [ [ :л | :н ] :Vow ]/:0 ;
!@ у:у р:р ь:0 {а}:и {Н}:н _:_ д:д {А}:а х:х {ь}:ь 

"ь deletion before {а}"
ь:0 <=> _ %{а%}:и/[:0 - [ %{А1%}: | %{I%}: | %{У%}: ] ] ;
!        _ %>: %{А%}: %{А%}: ;
    except
        _ [ %{А%}: | %{I%}: | %{У%}: ]/:0 ;
        _ [ :Voiced ]/:0 ;

"ь becomes и before {А1} and мнглбвр"
ь:и <=> _ [ %{А1%}: | %{I%}: | %{У%}: ]/:0 ;
        _ [ :Voiced ]/:0 ;
    except
        _ [ %{а%}: ]/[ :0 - [ %{а%}: ] ] ;
        ! let things like урь>{а}{Н}д be taken care of by {а}:и not ь:и
        

!!!! MISC !!!!

"{ь} appears with back-vowels"
%{ь%}:ь <=> %{А%}:BackVow :NonVow (:NonVow*) _ ;

"{В} surfaces as б after л, nasals, and в"
%{В%}:б <=> [ :в | :Nasal | :л ]/[ :0 | %  | ь:и ]* _ ;

"{Д} devoices after some stuff"
%{Д%}:т <=> [ :г | :р | :в ]/[ :0 - %{ъ%}:0 ] _ ;

"{Ж} devoices sometimes"
%{Ж%}:ч <=> [ :г | :р | :в ] [ :0 - %{ъ%}:0 ]* _ ;

"{Р} dissimilates to л after р"
%{Р%}:л <=> [ :р (:ь) ]/[ :0 | %  ] _ ;

!!!! extra {н} stuff !!!!

"{н} surfaces after diphthongs in non-ExtraN plural morpheme"
%{н%}:н <=> :Vow :й/:0 _ %{У%}: %{У%}: ;

!"{н} surfaces at the end of a triggers deletion of genitive-final н"
!н:0 <=> %{н%}:н %{I%}: %{й%}: _ ;

"genitive-final н deletes after regular noun stems ending in н"
н:0 <=> [ :н - %{ң%}: ] %>: %{г%}: %{I%}: %{й%}: _ ;

"{н} in regular plural is г after {ң}-final stems"
%{н%}:г <=> %{ң%}:н/:0 _ ;


!!!! extra {Н} noun phonology !!!!

"{Н} deletes in dative after diphthongs"
%{Н%}:0 <=> :Vow :й %>: %{а%}: _ д ;
